Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.19201

Affordable housing—Inventory of suitable property.

(1) The department shall identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall include the location, approximate size, and current zoning classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of commerce by November 1, 1993, and every November 1 thereafter.

(2) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994, the department shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer available for the development of affordable housing. The department shall include an updated listing of real property that has become available since the last update. As used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 218; 1995 c 399 s 64; 1993 c 461 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Finding—1993 c 461: See note following RCW 43.63A.510.